Illinois, session 104th, SB1519.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Findings and intent.5    (a) The General Assembly finds the following:6        (1) Public Act 99-456 prohibited schools from issuing 7    monetary fines or fees as a disciplinary consequence.8        (2) Public Act 100-810 prohibited schools from 9    referring truant minors to local public entities for the 10    purpose of issuing fines or fees as punishment for truancy 11    and required schools to document the provision of all 12    appropriate and available supportive services before 13    referring an individual having custody of a truant minor 14    to a local public entity.15        (3) Thousands of students have been referred to 16    municipalities for behaviors occurring on school grounds, 17    during school-related events, or while taking school 18    transportation.19        (4) Municipal tickets, citations, and ordinance 20    violations disproportionately impact students of color and 21    students with disabilities.22        (5) Municipal fines and fees associated with municipal 23    tickets, citations, and ordinance violations create 24    financial hardship for minors and their families.  SB1519 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 06247 LNS 16282 b1        (6) Municipal proceedings do not provide minors with 2    sufficient due process, confidentiality, or record 3    expungement protections.4        (7) In accordance with federal law and regulations, 5    Illinois schools provide data to the Civil Rights Data 6    Collection required by the Office for Civil Rights of the 7    U.S. Department of Education, including data on referrals 8    to law enforcement, and which disaggregates referrals 9    resulting in arrests, but does not disaggregate referrals 10    resulting in a municipal ticket, citation, or ordinance 11    violation.12    (b) It is the intent of the General Assembly to learn more 13about the prevalence of student referrals to law enforcement, 14particularly those resulting in municipal tickets, citations, 15and ordinance violations for behaviors occurring on school 16grounds, during school-related events, or while taking school 17transportation. It is not the intent of the General Assembly 18to modify current school disciplinary responses provided in 19the School Code or responses to alleged delinquent or criminal 20conduct as set forth in the School Code, the Juvenile Court Act 21of 1987, or the Criminal Code of 2012. 22    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Section 232-3.206 and by changing Sections 10-20.14, 10-20.68, 10-22.6, 24and 26-12 as follows:   SB1519 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 06247 LNS 16282 b1    (105 ILCS 5/2-3.206 new)2    Sec. 2-3.206. Law enforcement referral report. 3    (a) As used in this Section, "referral to law enforcement" 4means an action by which a student is reported to a law 5enforcement agency or official, including a school police 6unit, for an incident that occurred on school grounds, during 7school-related events or activities (whether in-person or 8virtual), or while taking school transportation, regardless of 9whether official action is taken. "Referral to law 10enforcement" includes citations, tickets, court referrals, and 11school-related arrests.12    (b) Beginning with the 2027-2028 school year, the State 13Board of Education shall require that each school district 14annually report, in a manner and method determined by the 15State Board, the number of students in kindergarten through 16grade 12 who were referred to a law enforcement agency or 17official and the number of instances of referrals to law 18enforcement that students in grades kindergarten through 12 19received. 20    (c) The data reported under subsection (b) shall be 21disaggregated by race and ethnicity, sex, grade level, whether 22a student is an English learner, and disability. 23    (d) On or before January 31, 2029 and on or before January 2431 of each subsequent year, the State Board of Education, 25through the State Superintendent of Education, shall prepare a 26report on student referrals to law enforcement in all school   SB1519 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 06247 LNS 16282 b1districts in this State, including State-authorized charter 2schools. This report shall include data from all public 3schools within school districts, including district-authorized 4charter schools. This report must be posted on the Internet 5website of the State Board of Education. The report shall 6include data reported under subsection (b) and shall be 7disaggregated according to subsection (c). 8    (105 ILCS 5/10-20.14)  (from Ch. 122, par. 10-20.14)9    Sec. 10-20.14. Student discipline policies; parent-teacher 10advisory committee.11    (a) To establish and maintain a parent-teacher advisory 12committee to develop with the school board or governing body 13of a charter school policy guidelines on student discipline, 14including school searches and bullying prevention as set forth 15in Section 27-23.7 of this Code. School authorities shall 16furnish a copy of the policy to the parents or guardian of each 17student within 15 days after the beginning of the school year, 18or within 15 days after starting classes for a student who 19transfers into the district during the school year, and the 20school board or governing body of a charter school shall 21require that a school inform its students of the contents of 22the policy. School boards and the governing bodies of charter 23schools, along with the parent-teacher advisory committee, 24must annually review their student discipline policies and the 25implementation of those policies and any other factors related   SB1519 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 06247 LNS 16282 b1to the safety of their schools, students, and school 2personnel.3    (a-5) On or before September 15, 2016, each elementary and 4secondary school and charter school shall, at a minimum, adopt 5student discipline policies that fulfill the requirements set 6forth in this Section, subsections (a) and (b) of Section 710-22.6 of this Code, Section 34-19 of this Code if 8applicable, and federal and State laws that provide special 9requirements for the discipline of students with disabilities. 10    (b) The parent-teacher advisory committee in cooperation 11with local law enforcement agencies shall develop, with the 12school board, policy guideline procedures to establish and 13maintain a reciprocal reporting system between the school 14district and local law enforcement agencies regarding criminal 15and civil offenses committed by students. School districts are 16encouraged to create memoranda of understanding with local law 17enforcement agencies that clearly define law enforcement's 18role in schools, in accordance with Sections 2-3.206 and 19Section 10-22.6 of this Code. In consultation with 20stakeholders deemed appropriate by the State Board of 21Education, the State Board of Education shall draft and 22publish guidance for the development of reciprocal reporting 23systems in accordance with this Section on or before July 1, 242025. 25    (c) The parent-teacher advisory committee, in cooperation 26with school bus personnel, shall develop, with the school   SB1519 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 06247 LNS 16282 b1board, policy guideline procedures to establish and maintain 2school bus safety procedures. These procedures shall be 3incorporated into the district's student discipline policy. In 4consultation with stakeholders deemed appropriate by the State 5Board of Education, the State Board of Education shall draft 6and publish guidance for school bus safety procedures in 7accordance with this Section on or before July 1, 2025. 8    (d) As used in this subsection (d), "evidence-based 9intervention" means intervention that has demonstrated a 10statistically significant effect on improving student outcomes 11as documented in peer-reviewed scholarly journals. 12    The school board, in consultation with the parent-teacher 13advisory committee and other community-based organizations, 14must include provisions in the student discipline policy to 15address students who have demonstrated behaviors that put them 16at risk for aggressive behavior, including without limitation 17bullying, as defined in the policy. These provisions must 18include procedures for notifying parents or legal guardians 19and intervention procedures based upon available 20community-based and district resources. 21    In consultation with behavioral health experts, the State 22Board of Education shall draft and publish guidance for 23evidence-based intervention procedures, including examples, in 24accordance with this Section on or before July 1, 2025. 25(Source: P.A. 103-896, eff. 8-9-24.)   SB1519 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 06247 LNS 16282 b1    (105 ILCS 5/10-20.68)2    Sec. 10-20.68. School resource officer.3    (a) In this Section, "school resource officer" means a law 4enforcement officer who has been primarily assigned to a 5school or school district under a memorandum of understanding 6between an agreement with a local law enforcement agency and a 7school district.8    (a-5) Beginning July 1, 2026, a memorandum of 9understanding between a local law enforcement agency and a 10school district is required for any school district that uses 11a school resource officer. The memorandum of understanding 12shall include provisions that:13        (1) define the role, duties, and responsibilities of a 14    school resource officer;15        (2) specify procedures to ensure that a school 16    resource officer has been trained or has received a waiver 17    for training, as provided in Section 10.22 of the Illinois 18    Police Training Act, including specific training on 19    working with students with disabilities to ensure 20    appropriate and effective interactions that support their 21    educational and behavioral needs;22        (3) specify that a school resource officer is 23    prohibited from issuing tickets or citations on school 24    property in accordance with subsection (i) of Section 25    10-22.6;26        (4) outline a process for data collection and   SB1519 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 06247 LNS 16282 b1    reporting in accordance with Section 2-3.206; and2        (5) provide for regular review and evaluation of the 3    school resource officer program, including community and 4    stakeholder input. 5    (b) Any Beginning January 1, 2021, any law enforcement 6agency that provides a school resource officer under this 7Section shall provide to the school district a certificate of 8completion, or approved waiver, issued by the Illinois Law 9Enforcement Training Standards Board under Section 10.22 of 10the Illinois Police Training Act indicating that the subject 11officer has completed the requisite course of instruction in 12the applicable subject areas within one year of assignment, or 13has prior experience and training which satisfies this 14requirement. 15    (c) In an effort to defray the related costs, any law 16enforcement agency that provides a school resource officer 17should apply for grant funding through the federal Community 18Oriented Policing Services grant program.19(Source: P.A. 100-984, eff. 1-1-19; 101-81, eff. 7-12-19.) 20    (105 ILCS 5/10-22.6)  (from Ch. 122, par. 10-22.6)21    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 102-466)22    Sec. 10-22.6. Suspension or expulsion of students; school 23searches. 24    (a) To expel students guilty of gross disobedience or 25misconduct, including gross disobedience or misconduct   SB1519 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 06247 LNS 16282 b1perpetuated by electronic means, pursuant to subsection (b-20) 2of this Section, and no action shall lie against them for such 3expulsion. Expulsion shall take place only after the parents 4have been requested to appear at a meeting of the board, or 5with a hearing officer appointed by it, to discuss their 6child's behavior. Such request shall be made by registered or 7certified mail and shall state the time, place and purpose of 8the meeting. The board, or a hearing officer appointed by it, 9at such meeting shall state the reasons for dismissal and the 10date on which the expulsion is to become effective. If a 11hearing officer is appointed by the board, the hearing officer 12shall report to the board a written summary of the evidence 13heard at the meeting and the board may take such action thereon 14as it finds appropriate. If the board acts to expel a student, 15the written expulsion decision shall detail the specific 16reasons why removing the student from the learning environment 17is in the best interest of the school. The expulsion decision 18shall also include a rationale as to the specific duration of 19the expulsion. An expelled student may be immediately 20transferred to an alternative program in the manner provided 21in Article 13A or 13B of this Code. A student must not be 22denied transfer because of the expulsion, except in cases in 23which such transfer is deemed to cause a threat to the safety 24of students or staff in the alternative program. 25    (b) To suspend or by policy to authorize the 26superintendent of the district or the principal, assistant   SB1519 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 06247 LNS 16282 b1principal, or dean of students of any school to suspend 2students guilty of gross disobedience or misconduct, or to 3suspend students guilty of gross disobedience or misconduct on 4the school bus from riding the school bus, pursuant to 5subsections (b-15) and (b-20) of this Section, and no action 6shall lie against them for such suspension. The board may by 7policy authorize the superintendent of the district or the 8principal, assistant principal, or dean of students of any 9school to suspend students guilty of such acts for a period not 10to exceed 10 school days. If a student is suspended due to 11gross disobedience or misconduct on a school bus, the board 12may suspend the student in excess of 10 school days for safety 13reasons. 14    Any suspension shall be reported immediately to the 15parents or guardian of a student along with a full statement of 16the reasons for such suspension and a notice of their right to 17a review. The school board must be given a summary of the 18notice, including the reason for the suspension and the 19suspension length. Upon request of the parents or guardian, 20the school board or a hearing officer appointed by it shall 21review such action of the superintendent or principal, 22assistant principal, or dean of students. At such review, the 23parents or guardian of the student may appear and discuss the 24suspension with the board or its hearing officer. If a hearing 25officer is appointed by the board, he shall report to the board 26a written summary of the evidence heard at the meeting. After   SB1519 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 06247 LNS 16282 b1its hearing or upon receipt of the written report of its 2hearing officer, the board may take such action as it finds 3appropriate. If a student is suspended pursuant to this 4subsection (b), the board shall, in the written suspension 5decision, detail the specific act of gross disobedience or 6misconduct resulting in the decision to suspend. The 7suspension decision shall also include a rationale as to the 8specific duration of the suspension.9    (b-5) Among the many possible disciplinary interventions 10and consequences available to school officials, school 11exclusions, such as out-of-school suspensions and expulsions, 12are the most serious. School officials shall limit the number 13and duration of expulsions and suspensions to the greatest 14extent practicable, and it is recommended that they use them 15only for legitimate educational purposes. To ensure that 16students are not excluded from school unnecessarily, it is 17recommended that school officials consider forms of 18non-exclusionary discipline prior to using out-of-school 19suspensions or expulsions. 20    (b-10) Unless otherwise required by federal law or this 21Code, school boards may not institute zero-tolerance policies 22by which school administrators are required to suspend or 23expel students for particular behaviors.24    (b-15) Out-of-school suspensions of 3 days or less may be 25used only if the student's continuing presence in school would 26pose a threat to school safety or a disruption to other   SB1519 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 06247 LNS 16282 b1students' learning opportunities. For purposes of this 2subsection (b-15), "threat to school safety or a disruption to 3other students' learning opportunities" shall be determined on 4a case-by-case basis by the school board or its designee. 5School officials shall make all reasonable efforts to resolve 6such threats, address such disruptions, and minimize the 7length of suspensions to the greatest extent practicable.8    (b-20) Unless otherwise required by this Code, 9out-of-school suspensions of longer than 3 days, expulsions, 10and disciplinary removals to alternative schools may be used 11only if other appropriate and available behavioral and 12disciplinary interventions have been exhausted and the 13student's continuing presence in school would either (i) pose 14a threat to the safety of other students, staff, or members of 15the school community or (ii) substantially disrupt, impede, or 16interfere with the operation of the school. For purposes of 17this subsection (b-20), "threat to the safety of other 18students, staff, or members of the school community" and 19"substantially disrupt, impede, or interfere with the 20operation of the school" shall be determined on a case-by-case 21basis by school officials. For purposes of this subsection 22(b-20), the determination of whether "appropriate and 23available behavioral and disciplinary interventions have been 24exhausted" shall be made by school officials. School officials 25shall make all reasonable efforts to resolve such threats, 26address such disruptions, and minimize the length of student   SB1519 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 06247 LNS 16282 b1exclusions to the greatest extent practicable. Within the 2suspension decision described in subsection (b) of this 3Section or the expulsion decision described in subsection (a) 4of this Section, it shall be documented whether other 5interventions were attempted or whether it was determined that 6there were no other appropriate and available interventions.7    (b-25) Students who are suspended out-of-school for longer 8than 3 school days shall be provided appropriate and available 9support services during the period of their suspension. For 10purposes of this subsection (b-25), "appropriate and available 11support services" shall be determined by school authorities. 12Within the suspension decision described in subsection (b) of 13this Section, it shall be documented whether such services are 14to be provided or whether it was determined that there are no 15such appropriate and available services. 16    A school district may refer students who are expelled to 17appropriate and available support services.18    A school district shall create a policy to facilitate the 19re-engagement of students who are suspended out-of-school, 20expelled, or returning from an alternative school setting. In 21consultation with stakeholders deemed appropriate by the State 22Board of Education, the State Board of Education shall draft 23and publish guidance for the re-engagement of students who are 24suspended out-of-school, expelled, or returning from an 25alternative school setting in accordance with this Section and 26Section 13A-4 on or before July 1, 2025.   SB1519 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 06247 LNS 16282 b1    (b-30) A school district shall create a policy by which 2suspended students, including those students suspended from 3the school bus who do not have alternate transportation to 4school, shall have the opportunity to make up work for 5equivalent academic credit. It shall be the responsibility of 6a student's parent or guardian to notify school officials that 7a student suspended from the school bus does not have 8alternate transportation to school. 9    (c) A school board must invite a representative from a 10local mental health agency to consult with the board at the 11meeting whenever there is evidence that mental illness may be 12the cause of a student's expulsion or suspension.13    (c-5) School districts shall make reasonable efforts to 14provide ongoing professional development to all school 15personnel, school board members, and school resource officers, 16on the requirements of this Section and Section 10-20.14, the 17adverse consequences of school exclusion and justice-system 18involvement, effective classroom management strategies, 19culturally responsive discipline, trauma-responsive learning 20environments, as defined in subsection (b) of Section 3-11, 21the appropriate and available supportive services for the 22promotion of student attendance and engagement, and 23developmentally appropriate disciplinary methods that promote 24positive and healthy school climates. 25    (d) The board may expel a student for a definite period of 26time not to exceed 2 calendar years, as determined on a   SB1519 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 06247 LNS 16282 b1case-by-case basis. A student who is determined to have 2brought one of the following objects to school, any 3school-sponsored activity or event, or any activity or event 4that bears a reasonable relationship to school shall be 5expelled for a period of not less than one year:6        (1) A firearm. For the purposes of this Section, 7    "firearm" means any gun, rifle, shotgun, weapon as defined 8    by Section 921 of Title 18 of the United States Code, 9    firearm as defined in Section 1.1 of the Firearm Owners 10    Identification Card Act, or firearm as defined in Section 11    24-1 of the Criminal Code of 2012. The expulsion period 12    under this subdivision (1) may be modified by the 13    superintendent, and the superintendent's determination may 14    be modified by the board on a case-by-case basis.15        (2) A knife, brass knuckles or other knuckle weapon 16    regardless of its composition, a billy club, or any other 17    object if used or attempted to be used to cause bodily 18    harm, including "look alikes" of any firearm as defined in 19    subdivision (1) of this subsection (d). The expulsion 20    requirement under this subdivision (2) may be modified by 21    the superintendent, and the superintendent's determination 22    may be modified by the board on a case-by-case basis. 23Expulsion or suspension shall be construed in a manner 24consistent with the federal Individuals with Disabilities 25Education Act. A student who is subject to suspension or 26expulsion as provided in this Section may be eligible for a   SB1519 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 06247 LNS 16282 b1transfer to an alternative school program in accordance with 2Article 13A of the School Code.3    (d-5) The board may suspend or by regulation authorize the 4superintendent of the district or the principal, assistant 5principal, or dean of students of any school to suspend a 6student for a period not to exceed 10 school days or may expel 7a student for a definite period of time not to exceed 2 8calendar years, as determined on a case-by-case basis, if (i) 9that student has been determined to have made an explicit 10threat on an Internet website against a school employee, a 11student, or any school-related personnel, (ii) the Internet 12website through which the threat was made is a site that was 13accessible within the school at the time the threat was made or 14was available to third parties who worked or studied within 15the school grounds at the time the threat was made, and (iii) 16the threat could be reasonably interpreted as threatening to 17the safety and security of the threatened individual because 18of the individual's duties or employment status or status as a 19student inside the school. 20    (e) To maintain order and security in the schools, school 21authorities may inspect and search places and areas such as 22lockers, desks, parking lots, and other school property and 23equipment owned or controlled by the school, as well as 24personal effects left in those places and areas by students, 25without notice to or the consent of the student, and without a 26search warrant. As a matter of public policy, the General   SB1519 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 06247 LNS 16282 b1Assembly finds that students have no reasonable expectation of 2privacy in these places and areas or in their personal effects 3left in these places and areas. School authorities may request 4the assistance of law enforcement officials for the purpose of 5conducting inspections and searches of lockers, desks, parking 6lots, and other school property and equipment owned or 7controlled by the school for illegal drugs, weapons, or other 8illegal or dangerous substances or materials, including 9searches conducted through the use of specially trained dogs. 10If a search conducted in accordance with this Section produces 11evidence that the student has violated or is violating either 12the law, local ordinance, or the school's policies or rules, 13such evidence may be seized by school authorities, and 14disciplinary action may be taken. School authorities may also 15turn over such evidence to law enforcement authorities.16    (f) Suspension or expulsion may include suspension or 17expulsion from school and all school activities and a 18prohibition from being present on school grounds.19    (g) A school district may adopt a policy providing that if 20a student is suspended or expelled for any reason from any 21public or private school in this or any other state, the 22student must complete the entire term of the suspension or 23expulsion in an alternative school program under Article 13A 24of this Code or an alternative learning opportunities program 25under Article 13B of this Code before being admitted into the 26school district if there is no threat to the safety of students   SB1519 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 06247 LNS 16282 b1or staff in the alternative program.2    (h) School officials shall not advise or encourage 3students to drop out voluntarily due to behavioral or academic 4difficulties.5    (i) In this subsection (i), "municipal code violation" 6means the violation of a rule or regulation established by a 7local government authority, authorized by Section 1-2-1 of the 8Illinois Municipal Code.9    A student must may not be issued a monetary fine, or fee, 10ticket, or citation as a school-based disciplinary consequence 11or for a municipal code violation on school grounds during 12school hours or while taking school transportation by any 13person as a disciplinary consequence, though this shall not 14preclude requiring a student to provide restitution for lost, 15stolen, or damaged property.16    This subsection (i) does not modify school disciplinary 17responses under this Section or Section 10-20.14 of this Code 18that existed before the effective date of this amendatory Act 19of the 104th General Assembly or responses to alleged 20delinquent or criminal conduct set forth in this Code, Article 21V of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, or the Criminal Code of 222012. This subsection (i) does not apply to violations of 23traffic, boating, or fish and game laws. 24    (j) Subsections (a) through (i) of this Section shall 25apply to elementary and secondary schools, charter schools, 26special charter districts, and school districts organized   SB1519 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 06247 LNS 16282 b1under Article 34 of this Code. 2    (k) The expulsion of students enrolled in programs funded 3under Section 1C-2 of this Code is subject to the requirements 4under paragraph (7) of subsection (a) of Section 2-3.71 of 5this Code.6    (l) An in-school suspension program provided by a school 7district for any students in kindergarten through grade 12 may 8focus on promoting non-violent conflict resolution and 9positive interaction with other students and school personnel. 10A school district may employ a school social worker or a 11licensed mental health professional to oversee an in-school 12suspension program in kindergarten through grade 12. 13(Source: P.A. 102-539, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 14103-594, eff. 6-25-24; 103-896, eff. 8-9-24; revised 9-25-24.) 15    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 102-466)16    Sec. 10-22.6. Suspension or expulsion of students; school 17searches. 18    (a) To expel students guilty of gross disobedience or 19misconduct, including gross disobedience or misconduct 20perpetuated by electronic means, pursuant to subsection (b-20) 21of this Section, and no action shall lie against them for such 22expulsion. Expulsion shall take place only after the parents 23or guardians have been requested to appear at a meeting of the 24board, or with a hearing officer appointed by it, to discuss 25their child's behavior. Such request shall be made by   SB1519 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 06247 LNS 16282 b1registered or certified mail and shall state the time, place 2and purpose of the meeting. The board, or a hearing officer 3appointed by it, at such meeting shall state the reasons for 4dismissal and the date on which the expulsion is to become 5effective. If a hearing officer is appointed by the board, the 6hearing officer shall report to the board a written summary of 7the evidence heard at the meeting and the board may take such 8action thereon as it finds appropriate. If the board acts to 9expel a student, the written expulsion decision shall detail 10the specific reasons why removing the student from the 11learning environment is in the best interest of the school. 12The expulsion decision shall also include a rationale as to 13the specific duration of the expulsion. An expelled student 14may be immediately transferred to an alternative program in 15the manner provided in Article 13A or 13B of this Code. A 16student must not be denied transfer because of the expulsion, 17except in cases in which such transfer is deemed to cause a 18threat to the safety of students or staff in the alternative 19program. 20    (b) To suspend or by policy to authorize the 21superintendent of the district or the principal, assistant 22principal, or dean of students of any school to suspend 23students guilty of gross disobedience or misconduct, or to 24suspend students guilty of gross disobedience or misconduct on 25the school bus from riding the school bus, pursuant to 26subsections (b-15) and (b-20) of this Section, and no action   SB1519 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 06247 LNS 16282 b1shall lie against them for such suspension. The board may by 2policy authorize the superintendent of the district or the 3principal, assistant principal, or dean of students of any 4school to suspend students guilty of such acts for a period not 5to exceed 10 school days. If a student is suspended due to 6gross disobedience or misconduct on a school bus, the board 7may suspend the student in excess of 10 school days for safety 8reasons. 9    Any suspension shall be reported immediately to the 10parents or guardians of a student along with a full statement 11of the reasons for such suspension and a notice of their right 12to a review. The school board must be given a summary of the 13notice, including the reason for the suspension and the 14suspension length. Upon request of the parents or guardians, 15the school board or a hearing officer appointed by it shall 16review such action of the superintendent or principal, 17assistant principal, or dean of students. At such review, the 18parents or guardians of the student may appear and discuss the 19suspension with the board or its hearing officer. If a hearing 20officer is appointed by the board, he shall report to the board 21a written summary of the evidence heard at the meeting. After 22its hearing or upon receipt of the written report of its 23hearing officer, the board may take such action as it finds 24appropriate. If a student is suspended pursuant to this 25subsection (b), the board shall, in the written suspension 26decision, detail the specific act of gross disobedience or   SB1519 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 06247 LNS 16282 b1misconduct resulting in the decision to suspend. The 2suspension decision shall also include a rationale as to the 3specific duration of the suspension.4    (b-5) Among the many possible disciplinary interventions 5and consequences available to school officials, school 6exclusions, such as out-of-school suspensions and expulsions, 7are the most serious. School officials shall limit the number 8and duration of expulsions and suspensions to the greatest 9extent practicable, and it is recommended that they use them 10only for legitimate educational purposes. To ensure that 11students are not excluded from school unnecessarily, it is 12recommended that school officials consider forms of 13non-exclusionary discipline prior to using out-of-school 14suspensions or expulsions. 15    (b-10) Unless otherwise required by federal law or this 16Code, school boards may not institute zero-tolerance policies 17by which school administrators are required to suspend or 18expel students for particular behaviors.19    (b-15) Out-of-school suspensions of 3 days or less may be 20used only if the student's continuing presence in school would 21pose a threat to school safety or a disruption to other 22students' learning opportunities. For purposes of this 23subsection (b-15), "threat to school safety or a disruption to 24other students' learning opportunities" shall be determined on 25a case-by-case basis by the school board or its designee. 26School officials shall make all reasonable efforts to resolve   SB1519 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 06247 LNS 16282 b1such threats, address such disruptions, and minimize the 2length of suspensions to the greatest extent practicable.3    (b-20) Unless otherwise required by this Code, 4out-of-school suspensions of longer than 3 days, expulsions, 5and disciplinary removals to alternative schools may be used 6only if other appropriate and available behavioral and 7disciplinary interventions have been exhausted and the 8student's continuing presence in school would either (i) pose 9a threat to the safety of other students, staff, or members of 10the school community or (ii) substantially disrupt, impede, or 11interfere with the operation of the school. For purposes of 12this subsection (b-20), "threat to the safety of other 13students, staff, or members of the school community" and 14"substantially disrupt, impede, or interfere with the 15operation of the school" shall be determined on a case-by-case 16basis by school officials. For purposes of this subsection 17(b-20), the determination of whether "appropriate and 18available behavioral and disciplinary interventions have been 19exhausted" shall be made by school officials. School officials 20shall make all reasonable efforts to resolve such threats, 21address such disruptions, and minimize the length of student 22exclusions to the greatest extent practicable. Within the 23suspension decision described in subsection (b) of this 24Section or the expulsion decision described in subsection (a) 25of this Section, it shall be documented whether other 26interventions were attempted or whether it was determined that   SB1519 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 06247 LNS 16282 b1there were no other appropriate and available interventions.2    (b-25) Students who are suspended out-of-school for longer 3than 3 school days shall be provided appropriate and available 4support services during the period of their suspension. For 5purposes of this subsection (b-25), "appropriate and available 6support services" shall be determined by school authorities. 7Within the suspension decision described in subsection (b) of 8this Section, it shall be documented whether such services are 9to be provided or whether it was determined that there are no 10such appropriate and available services. 11    A school district may refer students who are expelled to 12appropriate and available support services.13    A school district shall create a policy to facilitate the 14re-engagement of students who are suspended out-of-school, 15expelled, or returning from an alternative school setting. In 16consultation with stakeholders deemed appropriate by the State 17Board of Education, the State Board of Education shall draft 18and publish guidance for the re-engagement of students who are 19suspended out-of-school, expelled, or returning from an 20alternative school setting in accordance with this Section and 21Section 13A-4 on or before July 1, 2025. 22    (b-30) A school district shall create a policy by which 23suspended students, including those students suspended from 24the school bus who do not have alternate transportation to 25school, shall have the opportunity to make up work for 26equivalent academic credit. It shall be the responsibility of   SB1519 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 06247 LNS 16282 b1a student's parents or guardians to notify school officials 2that a student suspended from the school bus does not have 3alternate transportation to school. 4    (b-35) In all suspension review hearings conducted under 5subsection (b) or expulsion hearings conducted under 6subsection (a), a student may disclose any factor to be 7considered in mitigation, including his or her status as a 8parent, expectant parent, or victim of domestic or sexual 9violence, as defined in Article 26A. A representative of the 10parent's or guardian's choice, or of the student's choice if 11emancipated, must be permitted to represent the student 12throughout the proceedings and to address the school board or 13its appointed hearing officer. With the approval of the 14student's parent or guardian, or of the student if 15emancipated, a support person must be permitted to accompany 16the student to any disciplinary hearings or proceedings. The 17representative or support person must comply with any rules of 18the school district's hearing process. If the representative 19or support person violates the rules or engages in behavior or 20advocacy that harasses, abuses, or intimidates either party, a 21witness, or anyone else in attendance at the hearing, the 22representative or support person may be prohibited from 23further participation in the hearing or proceeding. A 24suspension or expulsion proceeding under this subsection 25(b-35) must be conducted independently from any ongoing 26criminal investigation or proceeding, and an absence of   SB1519 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 06247 LNS 16282 b1pending or possible criminal charges, criminal investigations, 2or proceedings may not be a factor in school disciplinary 3decisions.4    (b-40) During a suspension review hearing conducted under 5subsection (b) or an expulsion hearing conducted under 6subsection (a) that involves allegations of sexual violence by 7the student who is subject to discipline, neither the student 8nor his or her representative shall directly question nor have 9direct contact with the alleged victim. The student who is 10subject to discipline or his or her representative may, at the 11discretion and direction of the school board or its appointed 12hearing officer, suggest questions to be posed by the school 13board or its appointed hearing officer to the alleged victim. 14    (c) A school board must invite a representative from a 15local mental health agency to consult with the board at the 16meeting whenever there is evidence that mental illness may be 17the cause of a student's expulsion or suspension.18    (c-5) School districts shall make reasonable efforts to 19provide ongoing professional development to all school 20personnel, school board members, and school resource officers 21on the requirements of this Section and Section 10-20.14, the 22adverse consequences of school exclusion and justice-system 23involvement, effective classroom management strategies, 24culturally responsive discipline, trauma-responsive learning 25environments, as defined in subsection (b) of Section 3-11, 26the appropriate and available supportive services for the   SB1519 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 06247 LNS 16282 b1promotion of student attendance and engagement, and 2developmentally appropriate disciplinary methods that promote 3positive and healthy school climates. 4    (d) The board may expel a student for a definite period of 5time not to exceed 2 calendar years, as determined on a 6case-by-case basis. A student who is determined to have 7brought one of the following objects to school, any 8school-sponsored activity or event, or any activity or event 9that bears a reasonable relationship to school shall be 10expelled for a period of not less than one year:11        (1) A firearm. For the purposes of this Section, 12    "firearm" means any gun, rifle, shotgun, weapon as defined 13    by Section 921 of Title 18 of the United States Code, 14    firearm as defined in Section 1.1 of the Firearm Owners 15    Identification Card Act, or firearm as defined in Section 16    24-1 of the Criminal Code of 2012. The expulsion period 17    under this subdivision (1) may be modified by the 18    superintendent, and the superintendent's determination may 19    be modified by the board on a case-by-case basis.20        (2) A knife, brass knuckles or other knuckle weapon 21    regardless of its composition, a billy club, or any other 22    object if used or attempted to be used to cause bodily 23    harm, including "look alikes" of any firearm as defined in 24    subdivision (1) of this subsection (d). The expulsion 25    requirement under this subdivision (2) may be modified by 26    the superintendent, and the superintendent's determination   SB1519 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 06247 LNS 16282 b1    may be modified by the board on a case-by-case basis. 2Expulsion or suspension shall be construed in a manner 3consistent with the federal Individuals with Disabilities 4Education Act. A student who is subject to suspension or 5expulsion as provided in this Section may be eligible for a 6transfer to an alternative school program in accordance with 7Article 13A of the School Code.8    (d-5) The board may suspend or by regulation authorize the 9superintendent of the district or the principal, assistant 10principal, or dean of students of any school to suspend a 11student for a period not to exceed 10 school days or may expel 12a student for a definite period of time not to exceed 2 13calendar years, as determined on a case-by-case basis, if (i) 14that student has been determined to have made an explicit 15threat on an Internet website against a school employee, a 16student, or any school-related personnel, (ii) the Internet 17website through which the threat was made is a site that was 18accessible within the school at the time the threat was made or 19was available to third parties who worked or studied within 20the school grounds at the time the threat was made, and (iii) 21the threat could be reasonably interpreted as threatening to 22the safety and security of the threatened individual because 23of the individual's duties or employment status or status as a 24student inside the school. 25    (e) To maintain order and security in the schools, school 26authorities may inspect and search places and areas such as   SB1519 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 06247 LNS 16282 b1lockers, desks, parking lots, and other school property and 2equipment owned or controlled by the school, as well as 3personal effects left in those places and areas by students, 4without notice to or the consent of the student, and without a 5search warrant. As a matter of public policy, the General 6Assembly finds that students have no reasonable expectation of 7privacy in these places and areas or in their personal effects 8left in these places and areas. School authorities may request 9the assistance of law enforcement officials for the purpose of 10conducting inspections and searches of lockers, desks, parking 11lots, and other school property and equipment owned or 12controlled by the school for illegal drugs, weapons, or other 13illegal or dangerous substances or materials, including 14searches conducted through the use of specially trained dogs. 15If a search conducted in accordance with this Section produces 16evidence that the student has violated or is violating either 17the law, local ordinance, or the school's policies or rules, 18such evidence may be seized by school authorities, and 19disciplinary action may be taken. School authorities may also 20turn over such evidence to law enforcement authorities.21    (f) Suspension or expulsion may include suspension or 22expulsion from school and all school activities and a 23prohibition from being present on school grounds.24    (g) A school district may adopt a policy providing that if 25a student is suspended or expelled for any reason from any 26public or private school in this or any other state, the   SB1519 Enrolled- 30 -LRB104 06247 LNS 16282 b1student must complete the entire term of the suspension or 2expulsion in an alternative school program under Article 13A 3of this Code or an alternative learning opportunities program 4under Article 13B of this Code before being admitted into the 5school district if there is no threat to the safety of students 6or staff in the alternative program. A school district that 7adopts a policy under this subsection (g) must include a 8provision allowing for consideration of any mitigating 9factors, including, but not limited to, a student's status as 10a parent, expectant parent, or victim of domestic or sexual 11violence, as defined in Article 26A. 12    (h) School officials shall not advise or encourage 13students to drop out voluntarily due to behavioral or academic 14difficulties.15    (i) In this subsection (i), "municipal code violation" 16means the violation of a rule or regulation established by a 17local government authority, authorized by Section 1-2-1 of the 18Illinois Municipal Code.19    A student must may not be issued a monetary fine, or fee, 20ticket, or citation as a school-based disciplinary consequence 21or for a municipal code violation on school grounds during 22school hours or while taking school transportation by any 23person as a disciplinary consequence, though this shall not 24preclude requiring a student to provide restitution for lost, 25stolen, or damaged property.26    This subsection (i) does not modify school disciplinary   SB1519 Enrolled- 31 -LRB104 06247 LNS 16282 b1responses under this Section or Section 10-20.14 of this Code 2that existed before the effective date of this amendatory Act 3of the 104th General Assembly or responses to alleged 4delinquent or criminal conduct set forth in this Code, Article 5V of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, or the Criminal Code of 62012. This subsection (i) does not apply to violations of 7traffic, boating, or fish and game laws. 8    (j) Subsections (a) through (i) of this Section shall 9apply to elementary and secondary schools, charter schools, 10special charter districts, and school districts organized 11under Article 34 of this Code. 12    (k) Through June 30, 2026, the expulsion of students 13enrolled in programs funded under Section 1C-2 of this Code is 14subject to the requirements under paragraph (7) of subsection 15(a) of Section 2-3.71 of this Code.16    (k-5) On and after July 1, 2026, the expulsion of children 17enrolled in programs funded under Section 15-25 of the 18Department of Early Childhood Act is subject to the 19requirements of paragraph (7) of subsection (a) of Section 2015-30 of the Department of Early Childhood Act. 21    (l) An in-school suspension program provided by a school 22district for any students in kindergarten through grade 12 may 23focus on promoting non-violent conflict resolution and 24positive interaction with other students and school personnel. 25A school district may employ a school social worker or a 26licensed mental health professional to oversee an in-school   SB1519 Enrolled- 32 -LRB104 06247 LNS 16282 b1suspension program in kindergarten through grade 12.2(Source: P.A. 102-466, eff. 7-1-25; 102-539, eff. 8-20-21; 3102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-594, eff. 6-25-24; 103-896, eff. 48-9-24; revised 9-25-24.) 5    (105 ILCS 5/26-12)  (from Ch. 122, par. 26-12)6    Sec. 26-12. Punitive action. 7    (a) No punitive action, including out-of-school 8suspensions, expulsions, or court action, shall be taken 9against truant minors for such truancy unless appropriate and 10available supportive services and other school resources have 11been provided to the student. Notwithstanding the provisions 12of Section 10-22.6 of this Code, a truant minor may not be 13expelled for nonattendance unless he or she has accrued 15 14consecutive days of absences without valid cause and the 15student cannot be located by the school district or the school 16district has located the student but cannot, after exhausting 17all available supportive services, compel the student to 18return to school.19    (b) School personnel A school district may not refer a 20truant, chronic truant, or truant minor to any other local 21public entity, as defined under Section 1-206 of the Local 22Governmental and Governmental Employees Tort Immunity Act, 23school resource officer, as defined in Section 10-20.68 of 24this Code, or peace officer, as defined in Section 2-13 of the 25Criminal Code of 2012, for that local public entity, school   SB1519 Enrolled- 33 -LRB104 06247 LNS 16282 b1resource officer, or peace officer to issue the child a fine or 2a fee as punishment for his or her truancy.3    (c) A school district may refer any person having custody 4or control of a truant, chronic truant, or truant minor to any 5other local public entity, as defined under Section 1-206 of 6the Local Governmental and Governmental Employees Tort 7Immunity Act, for that local public entity to issue the person 8a fine or fee for the child's truancy only if the school 9district's truant officer, regional office of education, or 10intermediate service center has been notified of the truant 11behavior and the school district, regional office of 12education, or intermediate service center has offered all 13appropriate and available supportive services and other school 14resources to the child. Before a school district may refer a 15person having custody or control of a child to a municipality, 16as defined under Section 1-1-2 of the Illinois Municipal Code, 17the school district must provide the following appropriate and 18available services:19        (1) For any child who is a homeless child, as defined 20    under Section 1-5 of the Education for Homeless Children 21    Act, a meeting between the child, the person having 22    custody or control of the child, relevant school 23    personnel, and a homeless liaison to discuss any barriers 24    to the child's attendance due to the child's transitional 25    living situation and to construct a plan that removes 26    these barriers.  SB1519 Enrolled- 34 -LRB104 06247 LNS 16282 b1        (2) For any child with a documented disability, a 2    meeting between the child, the person having custody or 3    control of the child, and relevant school personnel to 4    review the child's current needs and address the 5    appropriateness of the child's placement and services. For 6    any child subject to Article 14 of this Code, this meeting 7    shall be an individualized education program meeting and 8    shall include relevant members of the individualized 9    education program team. For any child with a disability 10    under Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 11    1973 (29 U.S.C. 794), this meeting shall be a Section 504 12    plan review and include relevant members of the Section 13    504 plan team.14        (3) For any child currently being evaluated by a 15    school district for a disability or for whom the school 16    has a basis of knowledge that the child is a child with a 17    disability under 20 U.S.C. 1415(k)(5), the completion of 18    the evaluation and determination of the child's 19    eligibility for special education services.20    (d) Before a school district may refer a person having 21custody or control of a child to a local public entity under 22this Section, the school district must document any 23appropriate and available supportive services offered to the 24child. In the event a meeting under this Section does not 25occur, a school district must have documentation that it made 26reasonable efforts to convene the meeting at a mutually   SB1519 Enrolled- 35 -LRB104 06247 LNS 16282 b1convenient time and date for the school district and the 2person having custody or control of the child and, but for the 3conduct of that person, the meeting would have occurred. 4(Source: P.A. 100-810, eff. 1-1-19; 100-825, eff. 8-13-18; 5101-81, eff. 7-12-19.) 6    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 7changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 8that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 9represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 10not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 11made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 12Public Act. 13    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 14becoming law.